Indiana, session 2026, HB1070.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3-3-15.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2026 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 15.5. (a) This section
applies only to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Fire department" has the meaning set forth in
IC 22-12-1-12.
(2) "Volunteer firefighter" has the meaning set forth in
IC 36-8-12-2.
(c) Subject to subsection (d), each taxable year, an individual
who is an active volunteer firefighter in Indiana for at least six (6)
months during the taxable year is entitled to a credit against the
individual's adjusted gross income tax liability for the taxable year
equal to two hundred dollars ($200).
(d) The credit provided by this section may not exceed the
amount of the adjusted gross income tax imposed by IC 6-3-1
through IC 6-3-7 on the taxpayer's income for the taxable year,
2026 IN 1070—LS 6459/DI 129


reduced by the sum of all credits for the taxable year that are
applied before the application of the credit provided by this
section. The amount of any unused credit under this section for a
taxable year may not be carried forward to a succeeding taxable
year, carried back to a preceding taxable year, or refunded.
(e) The department shall prescribe a standard form that a fire
department must use to confirm a volunteer firefighter's service
for the fire department during a calendar year.
(f) Before February 1 each year, a fire department shall issue a
confirmation of service, using the form prescribed by the
department under subsection (e), to each volunteer firefighter who
served with the fire department during the immediately preceding
calendar year.
(g) If a volunteer firefighter wishing to claim the credit provided
by this section files a return for a taxable year using paper forms,
the volunteer firefighter shall submit the confirmation of service
issued to the volunteer firefighter under subsection (f) with the
volunteer firefighter's return for the taxable year. If a volunteer
firefighter wishing to claim the credit provided by this section files
a return electronically for the taxable year, the volunteer
firefighter shall retain the confirmation of service with the
volunteer firefighter's records for the taxable year. A volunteer
firefighter who files a return electronically for a taxable year shall
submit the confirmation of service to the department, if requested
by the department.
SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1070—LS 6459/DI 129